Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 26.5
MULTIJURISDICTIONAL JAILS

Section

17-26.5-101. Multijurisdictional jails - authorized.

The general assembly hereby authorizes any county, city and county, city, or the department of corrections of the state of Colorado to enter into a contract or contracts with each other in accordance with part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., to design, locate, construct, and operate a multijurisdictional jail for the incarceration of county, city and county, city, or state prisoners. In the alternative, the described governmental entities may enter into the necessary contracts with a private contractor for the provision and operation of such jail.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 940, § 4, effective July 1.

17-26.5-102. Contracts for multijurisdictional jails - requirements.

Any contract or contracts for the creation of a multijurisdictional jail as described in section 17-26.5-101 shall contain the following requirements:

An agreement regarding involvement by each of the governmental entities in the predesign planning, design, location, and construction of such a jail facility or involvement in any agreement to obtain a private contractor to provide a jail facility and the operation thereof;

An agreement regarding involvement by each of the governmental entities in construction management and oversight for such a jail facility;

An agreement regarding involvement by each of the governmental entities in financing the construction of such a jail facility;

An agreement regarding involvement by each of the governmental entities in financing and providing for staffing and operation of such jail facility, which may provide for staffing and operation solely by any county, city and county, or city with financial assistance from the state department of corrections or any other governmental entity involved, or staffing and operation through a joint staffing and operation agreement between any county, city and county, or city and the state department of corrections, if the department is involved in the multijurisdictional jail facility;

An agreement regarding involvement by each of the governmental entities in financing and providing for programs for such jail facility;

An agreement regarding utilization of such jail facility by each of the governmental entities involved in the multijurisdictional jail facility. However, if the state department of corrections is involved in the facility, such agreement shall provide that a proportionate number of beds in the facility, equal to the proportionate percentage of the financing of the construction and operation of the facility which was provided by the state department of corrections bears to the entire cost of the construction and operation of the facility, shall be reserved for utilization by the state department of corrections if such beds are needed by the department. Any such beds so reserved shall be counted by the department as available beds when determining the number of beds available in the state correctional system.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 941, § 4, effective July 1.